Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Generalities

118B.010.
2022 redistricting — Explanation of sources — Official maps.

For the purpose of this chapter:

The boundaries of the congressional districts created by this chapter shall be those shown on the maps generated by the Legislative Research Commission’s geographic information system to accompany the redistricting plan enacted into law. The official copies of these maps shall be on file with the State Board of Elections. A duplicate set of maps and associated population information shall be retained by the Legislative Research Commission.

Designated precincts are those precincts in existence on January 1, 2020. Precinct boundaries shown in the maps referred to in subsection (1) of this section are taken from county precinct maps and verified and corrected by the Legislative Research Commission staff in consultation with county election officials.

Census tracts and blocks shown in the maps referred to in subsection (1) of this section are those utilized for the making of the 2020 United States Census.

Population data utilized for redistricting is the 2020 United States Census Pub. L. 94-171 population data that was deemed to be official by the United States Secretary of Commerce on or before July 15, 2021, and election precinct population data prepared by the Legislative Research Commission staff from the official Pub. L. 94-171 population data.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 8, effective December 20, 1991; 2002, ch. 1, § 145, effective January 31, 2002; 2012, ch. 3, § 7, effective February 10, 2012; 2022 ch. 8, § 7, effective January 20, 2022.